hr-HR: Stil voblera: Blade/vibe; Crankbait; Dubokoroneći; Hibridni; Jerkbait; Bez usne; Površinski; Twitchbait; Ostalo
de: Wobbler-Stil: Blade/Vibe; Crankbait; Tiefläufer; Hybrid; Jerkbait; Lipless; Topwater/Oberfläche; Twitchbait; Sonstige
zh-CN: 摇摆器样式: 刀片/颤泳型; 摇摆型假饵; 深潜型; 混合型; 抽停型; 无唇型; 水面/表层; 抽搐假饵; 其他
fr: Type de poisson nageur: Lame/vibrant; Crankbait; Plongeant; Hybride; Jerkbait; Lipless; Surface; Twitchbait; Autre
lt-LT: Voblerio tipas: Blizgė / vibruojantis masalas; Crankbait tipo; Giliai neriantis; Hibridinis; Jerkbait tipo; Be liežuvėlio; Paviršinis; Twitchbait tipo; Kita
ja: ウォブラースタイル: ブレード/バイブレーション; クランクベイト; ディープランナー; ハイブリッド; ジャークベイト; リップレス; トップウォーター/サーフェス; トゥイッチベイト; その他
pt-PT: Estilo do wobbler: Lâmina/vibração; Crankbait; Deep runner; Híbrido; Jerkbait; Lipless; Superfície; Twitchbait; Outro
pt-BR: Wobbler estilo: Blade/vibe; Crankbait; Fundo (Deep runner); Híbrido; Jerkbait; Lipless; Superfície (Topwater); Twitchbait; Outro
fi: Vaapun tyyli: Blade/vibe; Crankbait; Syvännemalli; Hybridi; Jerkbait; Huuleton; Pintauistin; Twitchbait; Muu
el: Τύπος Wobbler: Blade/vibe; Crankbait; Deep runner; Υβριδική; Jerkbait; Lipless; Επιφανείας; Twitchbait; Άλλο
cs: Styl wobleru: Plandavka/vibrační; Crankbait; Hlubokopotápivý; Hybridní; Jerkbait; Bezlopatkový; Hladinový; Twitchbait; Jiné
ro-RO: Stil de nălucă oscilantă: Paletă/vibe; Crankbait; Deep runner; Hibrid; Jerkbait; Lipless; Topwater/la suprafață; Twitchbait; Altele
ko: 워블러 스타일: 블레이드/바이브; 크랭크베이트; 딥 러너; 하이브리드; 저크베이트; 리플리스; 탑워터/수면; 트위치베이트; 기타
es: Estilo del wobbler: Cuchara/vibración; Crankbait; De profundidad; Híbrido; Jerkbait; Sin babero; Superficie; Twitchbait; Otro
da: Wobblerstil: Blade/vibe; Crankbait; Deep runner; Hybrid; Jerkbait; Lipless; Overflade (topwater); Twitchbait; Andet
bg-BG: Стил на воблера: Блейд/вайб; Кранкбейт; Дълбоко газещ; Хибрид; Джъркбейт; Без лопатка (lipless); Повърхностен; Туичбейт; Друго
zh-TW: 擬餌樣式: 亮片/震動路亞; 搖擺路亞 (Crankbait); 深潛型; 混合型; 抽搐路亞 (Jerkbait); 無舌板; 水面系; 抽動路亞 (Twitchbait); 其他
pl: Styl woblera: Blade/vibe; Crankbait; Deep runner; Hybryda; Jerkbait; Lipless; Powierzchniowy; Twitchbait; Inny
nl: Wobbler stijl: Blade/vibe; Crankbait; Dieploper; Hybride; Jerkbait; Lipless; Topwater/oppervlakte; Twitchbait; Overige
tr: Wobbler stili: Blade/vibe; Crankbait; Derin dalan; Hibrit; Jerkbait; Gagasız; Su üstü/yüzey; Twitchbait; Diğer
sv: Wobbler-stil: Blade/vibe; Crankbait; Djupgående; Hybrid; Jerkbait; Utan sked; Ytbete; Twitchbait; Övrigt
en: Wobbler style: Blade/vibe; Crankbait; Deep runner; Hybrid; Jerkbait; Lipless; Topwater/surface; Twitchbait; Other
it: Stile Wobbler: Blade/vibe; Crankbait; Deep runner; Ibrido; Jerkbait; Lipless; Topwater/di superficie; Twitchbait; Altro
nb: Stil for wobbler: Blade/vibe; Crankbait; Dypgående; Hybrid; Jerkbait; Lipless; Overflate; Twitchbait; Annet
vi: Kiểu Wobbler: Dạng thìa/lưỡi cắt (Blade) / Rung (Vibe); Mồi nổi lặn sâu (Crankbait); Dòng lặn sâu; Mồi lai; Mồi lặn nông giật cục (Jerkbait); Không cản; Tầng mặt/bề mặt; Mồi chuyển động co giật (Twitchbait); Khác
ru: Стиль воблера: Блейдбейт / раттлин (vibe); Крэнк; Глубоководный (дип-раннер); Гибрид; Джеркбейт; Безлопастной (раттлин); Поверхностный (топвотер); Твитчбейт; Другое
th: สไตล์วอบเบลอร์: เบลด/ไวบ์; แครงก์เบต; ดีปรันเนอร์; ไฮบริด; เจิร์กเบต; ลิปเลส; ผิวน้ำ/ระดับพื้นผิว; ทวิตช์เบต; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Štýl voblera: Blade/vibe; Crankbait; Deep runner; Hybridné; Jerkbait; Bez lopatky; Hladinové; Twitchbait; Iné
sl-SI: Slog voblerja: Z lističem/vibro; Crankbait; Za globoko vodo; Hibridno; Jerkbait; Brez kljuna; Površinsko; Twitchbait; Drugo
hu: Wobbler stílusa: Blade/vibe; Crankbait; Deep runner; Hibrid; Jerkbait; Lipless; Felszíni; Twitchbait; Egyéb